Tennessee, session 114, SB1586.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. The General and Public Laws of the State of Tennessee, to the extent
incorporated herein, on revisal shall be a part of Tennessee Code Annotated as follows, to wit:
SB1586
010598
- 1 -

(Contents of bill attached)
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 010598